Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-251
Preadjudication
placement or detention; mental health placement; prohibitions.

(1) When a juvenile is taken into custody pursuant to sections
43-248 and 43-250, the court or magistrate may take any action for preadjudication
placement or detention prescribed in the Nebraska Juvenile Code.

(2) Any juvenile taken into custody under the Nebraska Juvenile
Code for allegedly being mentally ill and dangerous shall not be placed in
a staff secure juvenile facility, jail, or detention facility designed
for juveniles who are accused of criminal acts or for juveniles as described
in subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of section 43-247 either as a temporary placement
by a peace officer, as a temporary placement by a court, or as an adjudication
placement by the court.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 7;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 66;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 9.